Utah statutes.
16-16-203.   Delivery to and filing of records by division -- Effective time
and date.
(1)  A record authorized or required by this chapter to be delivered to the
division for filing shall be captioned to describe the record's purpose, be in
a medium and format permitted by the division, and be delivered to the
division.  If the filing fees have been paid, and unless the division
determines that the record does not comply with the filing requirements of
this chapter, the division shall file the record.
(2)  The division, upon request and payment of the required fee, shall furnish
a certified copy of any record filed by the division under this chapter to the
person making the request.
(3)  Except as otherwise provided in Sections 16-16-118 and 16-16-204, a
record delivered to the division for filing under this chapter may specify an
effective time and a delayed effective date that may include an effective time
on that date.  Except as otherwise provided in Sections 16-16-118 and
16-16-204, a record filed by the division under this chapter is effective:
(a)  if the record does not specify an effective time and does not specify a
delayed effective date, on the date and at the time the record is filed as
evidenced by the division's endorsement of the date and time on the record;
(b)  if the record specifies an effective time but not a delayed effective
date, on the date the record is filed at the time specified in the record;
(c)  if the record specifies a delayed effective date but not an effective
time, at 12:01 a.m. on the earlier of:
(i)  the specified date; or
(ii)  the 90th day after the record is filed; or
(d)  if the record specifies an effective time and a delayed effective date,
at the specified time on the earlier of:
(i)  the specified date; or
(ii)  the 90th day after the record is filed.
